Anti-Corruption Commission Act (V of 2004)
Section 26


65. Robert K Carr tried to visualize the mind-
set of Chief Justice Marshall, a great Chief Justice-of

the Supreme Court of the United States, in its infan-
cy in this manner:

“In other words, Marshall was invoking that
power for the ﬁrst time at just such a moment
when the Fathers probably intended it should be
exercised. Jefferson had become President and
his party had won control of Congress. The
Opposition had obtained complete control of the
political branches of the government. 15 it not
obvious that from the point of view of the
Founding Fathers and the Federalist Party the
time had come to point out that the Constitution
as a higher law did place restraints upon
Congress and that the Supreme Court as
guardian of the Constitution had power to
enforce those restraints?

In Mai-billy vs Madison we see Chief Justice
Marshall suggesting that the Supreme Court was
duty-bound as a matter of inescapable principle
to enforce the Constitution as a symbol of
restraint upon congressional authority through
the exercise of its power of judicial review
........ ” (Quoted from Robert K. Carr on ‘The
Supreme Court and Judicial Review’ at page-
71).

This is how the review was made two hun-
dred years ago in Marbury vs Madison:

“If an act ofthe legislature, repugnant to the
Constitution, is void, does it, notwithstanding its
invalidity, bind the courts, and oblige them to
give it effect? Or, in other words, though it be

not law, does it constitute a rule as operative as
ifit was a law?

.............. It is emphatically the province

and duty of the judicial department to say what

the law is.

........... The judicial power of the United
States is extended to all cases arising under the
Constitution.

Could it be the intention of those who gave
this power, to say that in using it the constitution
should not be looked into? That a case arising
under the constitution should be decided without
examining the instrument under which it rises?

This is too extravagant to be maintained
........ Thus, the particular phraseology of the
Constitution of the United States confirms and
strengthens the principle, supposed to be essen-
tial to all written constitutions, that a law repug-
nant to the constitution is void; and that courts,
as well as other 'LlCPttltlUCIltS, are bound by that
instrument.”(Quoted from Professor Noet T.

Dowling on the ‘Cases on Constitutional Law
Fifth Edition, 1954, at pages—95-97).

It will be interesting to note that Marbury
was not at all interested in the supremacy of the

Constitution or the Supreme Court’s power at


jUdicial review. He only made a request for man-
datnus upon Madison, the Secretary of State.
directing him to deliver his commission, which
was ready in all respect but could not be deliv-
ered to him earlier due to paucity of time. But the
Supreme Court in course of considering his
grievance, very consciously declared invalid an
Act of the Congress. This is how the US

Supreme Court wields its power of judicial
review oflegislative actions.

66. O Hood Phillips in his ‘Constitutional and

Administrative Law’, Seventh Edition (1987),
explains the mechanism at page-8:

“. . ...the Federal Courts have jurisdiction to
declare provisions of state constitutions, state
legislation and federal legislation repugnant to
the Federal Constitution. It is not strictly accu-
rate to say that the Courts declare legislation
void: when cases are brought before them judi-
cially, they may declare that an alleged right or
power does not exist or that an alleged wrong
has been committed because a certain statute
relied on is unconstitutional.”

67. This was also indicated by AR Cornelius,

C], in Fazlul 'Quader Chowd/mry vs Muhamnmd
Abdul Hague PLD 1963 SC 486, at page-503:

“The duty of interpreting the Constitution
is, in a fact a duty of enforcing the provisions of
the Constitution in any particular case brought
before the Courts in the form of litigation.”

68. Hatnoodur Rahman, C], in dealing with

Martial Law provision in Asma Jilcmi ’3 case held at
page -202: '

“However, as this question has been raised.
regarding the validity of Martial Law
Regulation No. 78, I must point out that it to!-
lows from what I have said earlier that it was
made by an authority whose legal competence
we have not been able to recognise on the
ground ()Fw:‘ttit ol'legal authority and the uncou-
slitutional manner ol‘ arrogation ol‘ power.“
any provision sought to




The moral is clear. if any provision sought to
oust the jurisdiction of Court that provision itself is
not law.

69. As such it 1s apparent that the Court may
consider. the constitutionality of any provision in
course of a litigation brought before it. Further it 1S
not for the aggrieved persons lo plead law but for the
Judges to apply the correct provisions of the
Constitution and the laws made there under and if
necessary under the circumstances, IS entitled either
to uphold any particular statute or to declare it invalid
being, contradictory to the Constitution so long the
Government gets adequate opportunity to support the
offending provision if so advised. This is the position
‘1 the United States, so also in India ‘and there is no
reason why it should be otherwise in Bangladesh.



70. It may be mentioned here that under our
Constitution all the powers and functions of the
Republic are vested in the three branches, namely,
the Legislature, the Executive and the Judiciary. All
these branches, however, owe their existence to the
Constitution since it is the embodiment of the will of
the people of Bangladesh. It is the people of
Bangladesh, who proclaimed that ‘We, the people of
Bangladesh’, deemed that there shall be a Supreme
Court for Bangladesh, that is why this Court came
into being out of Article 94 of the Constitution with
all the powers of a High Tribunal as exists in the
civilised world.

71. In this connection a historical episode was
narrated by BH Chowdhury, J. in Anwar Hossain
Chowdhury s case at para-253, page-108 (BLD) :—

 “253. This judgment will be incomplete if a
historical episode is not mentioned. Sir Coke
was summoned by King James first to answer
why the King could not himself decide cases

which has to go before his own court of Justice
Sir Coke asserted:

 “No King after the conquest assumed him-
self to give any judgment in any cause whatso-
ever which concerned the administration of jus
lice within the realm but these are solely d . :
mined in the court of Justice,” 

72. When King said that he thought the law
Was founded on reasons and that he and others had
reasons as well as Judges, Coke answered :-—

“True it was that God has endowed his
Majesty with excellent science and great
endowments of nature, but his Majesty Was not
learned in the law of his realm in England, and
causes which concemed the life or Inheritance,
or good or fortune of his subject, are not to be
decided by natural reasons, but by the Artificia|
reasons and judgment of the law, which law is
an act which requires long study and experi-
ence, before that a man can attain the Cog
nizance of it, and the law was the golden
metawand one and measure to try the causes of
the subject and which protect his Majesty in

safety and peace”.


73. About the independence of judiciary and its

power of judicial review, BH Chowdhury, J, in the
above case further observed, quoting Bhagwati, J

and Justice Krishna Iyer, J at para- 240-241, page-
105:

“240. This point may now be considered.
Independence of judiciary is not an abstract |
conception. Bhagwati, J said “if there 1s one
principle which runs through the entire fabric of
the Constitution, it is the principle of the rule of
law and under the Constitution, it is the judict-
ary which is entrusted with the task of keeping
every organ of the State within the limits of the
law and thereby making the rule of law a mea’
ingful and effective”. He said that the Judges
must uphold the core principle of the rule ©!
law, which says, “Be you ever so high, the !a’
is above you”. This is the principle of inde-
pendence of the judiciary, which is vital for the
establishment of real participatory democracy
maintenance of the rule of law as a dynamic
concept and delivery of social justice to the vul-
nerable sections of the Community. It is
principle of independence of the judiciary
which must be kept in mind while interpreting
the relevant provisions of the Constitutions
Gupta vs President of India ALR 1982 SOD
241. He further says, “what is necessary is

to have Judges who are prepared to fashion new
tools, forge new methods, innovate new strate-
gies and evolve a new jurisprudence, who are
judicial statesmen with a social vision and a cre-
ative faculty and who have, above all, a deep
sense of commitment to the Constitution with a
activist approach and obligation for accounta-
bility, not to any party in power nor to the oppo-
Sition .......... We need Judges who are
alive to the socio-economic realities of Indian
life, who are anxious to wipe every tear from
every eye, who have faith in the constitutional
values and who are ready to use law as an
instrument for achieving the constitutional
objectives (at page 179). He quoted the eloquent
words of Justice Krishna Iyer :

“Independence of the judiciary is not genu-
flexion; nor is it opposition to every proposition
of Government. It is neither judiciary made to
opposition measure nor Government’s pleasure”.

74. Thus there is no hesitation in saying that
these are the words of wisdom handed down to us by
the generations of Judges who very politely and
meekly from the beginning of the civilisation
reminded the monarch that the King is not above the
law but under the law. Some of them were behead-
ed, imprisoned or destroyed but the cherished theme
ran like a refrain throughout the pages of the histo-
ry.

75. In this part of the world we generally follow
the common law principles but Bangladesh has got
a written Constitution. This Constitution may be
termed as controlled or rigid but in contradistinction
to a Federal form of Government, as in the United
States, it has a Parliamentary form of Government
within limits set by the Constitution. Like the United
States, its three grand Departments, ‘the Legislature
makes, the Executive executes and judiciary con-
_ Strues the law’ (Chief Justice Marshall). But the
_ Bangladesh Parliament lacks the omnipotence of the
: British Parliament while the President is not the
executive head like the US President but the Prime
. Minister is, like British Prime Minister. However,

all the functionaries of the Republic owe their exis-
tence, powers and functions to the Constitution. "We
the people of Bangladesh’. gave themselves this
Constitution which is conceived of as 2 fundamental
or an organic or a Supreme Law nising lofty high
above all other laws in the country and Article 7(2)
expressly spelt out that any law which is inconsis-
tent with this Constitution, to that extent of the
inconsistency, is void. As such, the provisions of the
Constitution is the basis on which the vires of all
other existing laws and those passed by the
Legislature as well as the actions of the Executive.
are to be judged by the Supreme Court, under Its
power of judicial review. This power of judicial
review of the Supreme Court of Bangladesh is, sim-
ilar to those in the United States, Pakistan and in
India.

76. This is how the Legislature, the Executive
and the Judiciary functions under the Constitutional
scheme in Bangladesh. The Constitution is the
undoubted source of all powers and functions of all
three grand Departments of the Republic, just like
the United States, Pakistan and India. It is true that
like the Supreme Courts in the United States or in
India, the Supreme Court of Bangladesh has got the
power of review of both legislative and executive
actions but such power of review would not place
the Supreme Court with any higher position to those
of the other two Branches of the Republic. The
Supreme Court is the creation of the Constitution
just like the Legislature and the Executive. But the
Constitution endowed the Supreme Court with such
power of judicial review and since the Judges of the
Supreme Court have taken oath to preserve, protect
and defend the Constitution, they are obliged and
duty bound to declare and strike down any provision
of law which is inconsistent with the Constitution
without any fear or favour to anybody. This includes
the power to declare any provision seeking to oust
the jurisdiction of the Court, as uitra vires the

Constitution.

77, Hamoodur Rahman, CJ explains the legal
position thus in State vs Zia-ur-Rahman PLD 1973

“In exercising this powel, the judiciary
claims no supremacy over other organs: of the
Government but acts only as the administrator
of the public will. Even when it declares a leg-
islative measure unconstitutional and void, ut
does not do so, because, the judicial power Is
superior in degree Or dignity to
power; but because the Constitution has vested
it with the power to declare what the law 1s In
the cases, which come before it. It thus merely
enforces the Constitution as a paramount law
whenever a legislative enactment comes into
conflict with it because, it is its duty to see that
the Constitution prevails. It is only when the
Legislature fails to keep within its own
Constitutional limits, the judiciary steps in to
enforce compliance with the Constitution. This
is no doubt a delicate task as pointed out in the
case of Fazlul Ouader Chowdhury vs Shah
Newaz, which has to be performed with great
circumspection but it has nevertheless to be per-
formed as a sacred Constitutional duty when
other State functionaries disregard the limita-
tions imposed upon them or claim to exercise

power which the people have been careful to
withhold from them.”

78. His Lordship then considered the powers of
the Court in respect of the Constitutional measure at
page-71:

“I for my part cannot conceive of a situa-
tion, in which, after a formal written
Constitution has been lawfully adopted by a
competent body and has been generally accept-
ed by the people including the judiciary as the
Constitution of the country, the judiciary can
claim to declare any of its provisions ultra vires
or void. This will be no part of its function of
interpretation. Therefore, in my view, however
solemn or sacrosanct a document, if it is not
Incorporated in the Constitution or does not
form 4 part thereof it cannot control the
Constitution. At any rate, the Courts created
under the Constitution will not have the power
lo declare any provision of the Constitution

itself as being in violation of such a document
Ifin fact, that document contains the expression
of the will of the vast majority of tho people
then the remedy for correcting such 4 violation
will lie with the people and not with the judici-
ary”

79. Coming back to Bangladesh, Mustafa
Kamal, CJ, was emphatic in respect of the mm
pendence of Judiciary in Secretary, Ministry of
Finance vs Masdar Hossain 2000 BLT (AD) 231
where his Lordship held at para 60, Pages-263.4.


“60. when Parliament and the executive
instead of implementing the provisions of
Chapter I] of Part VI follow a different course
not sanctioned by the Constitution, the higher
Judiciary is within its jurisdiction to bring back
the Parliament and the executive from constitu-
tional derailment and give necessary directions
to follow the constitutional course.

This exercise was made by this Court in the
case of Kudrat-e-Elahi Panir vs Bangladesh, 44
DLR (AD) 319. We do not see why the High
Court Division or this Court cannot repeat that
exercise when a constitutional deviation ts
detected and when there is a constitutional man-
date to implement certain provisions of the
Constitution.”

It is thus clear that the High Court Division has
not only the power of judicial review of an Act of
Parliament but also has a duty to exercise such
power in case of violation of the Constitution. And
the High Court Division did it giving reasons.

80. Next question is whether in view of the pro-
visions of Article 111 of the Constitution, the deci-
sions of this Division passed in the cases of Halima
Khatun, Joynal Abedin, Ehteshamuddin, and
Nasiruddin to the effect that Martial Law proclama-
tions etc. were supra constitutional instrumen!s and
as such the Constitution must take a back seat, is
binding upon the High Court Division.

81. Before discussing the above questions, let us

get a clear picture of the major constitutional devel-

opments In erstwhile Pakistan and also in present
n and decision of the Supreme Court of
pakistan regarding Martial Law. Earlier we have
noted the relevant portion of the judgment of
yaqub Ali J in Asma Jilani’s case in this regard but
e same Is not that elaborate.


82. The first major event in this behalf in erst-
while Pakistan was the dissolution of the
Constituent Assembly of Pakistan by Governor-
General Ghulam Muhammad in 1954, which he did
on the following grounds:—
<br>
“(1) The Governor-General having consid-
ered the political crisis with which the country
is faced, has with deep regret some to the con-
clusion that the constitutional machinery has
broken down. He, therefore, has decided to
declare a state of emergency throughout
Pakistan. The Constituent Assembly as at pres-
ent constituted has lost the confidence of the
people and can no longer function.
<br>
.(2) The ultimate authority vests in the peo-
ple who will decide all issues including consti-
tutional issues through their representatives to
be elected afresh. Elections will be held as early
as possible.
<br>
(3) Until such time as elections are held, the
administration of the country will be carried on
by a reconstituted Cabinet. He has called upon
the Prime Minister to reform the Cabinet with a
view to giving the country a vigorous and stable

administration. The invitation has been accept-
ed and
<br>
(4) The security and stability of the country
ate of paramount importance. All personal sec-
tional and provisional interests must be subordi-
nated to the supreme national interest.”

This Act of the Governor-General was chal-
ed by Maulvi Tamizuddin Khan, President of
the Constituent Assembly, in the Chief Court of
 Sindh, the Chief Court of Sindh allowed the peti-
tion and declared the dissolution of the Assembly as
illigal.
 It was held that the Acts of the Constituent

Assembly when it did not function as the Federal
legislature did not require the Governor-General’s
assent. The Federation of Pakistan challenged the
judgment of the Sindh Chief Court before the
Federal Court. The Federal Court reversed the jude-
ment of the Sindh Chief Court on the ground that the
assent of the Governor-General was necessary for
the validity of all the laws and the amendments
made in the Government of India Act, 1935. The
Court held that since section 223A of the
Government of India Act under which the Chief
Court of Sindh assumed jurisdiction to issue the
writs did not receive assent of the Governor-
General, it was not yet law, and that, therefore, the
Chief Court had no jurisdiction to issue the writs.

83. However, in his dissenting judgment,
Cornelius J, (later CJ) held that there was nothing in
section 6(3) of the Indian Independence Act, or to
the status of Pakistan as a Dominion which created
the obligation that all laws made by the Constituent
Assembly of a constitutional nature, required the
assent of the Governor-General for their validity and
operation. Thus, by majority, the dissolution of the
Assembly was upheld on a legal ground. As to the
merits of the case, it was observed that it was whol-
ly unnecessary to go into the other issues and noth-
ing said in the judgment was to be taken as an
expression of opinion on anyone of those issues.

84. The next case of constitutional importance
was Usif Patel vs Crown [PLD 1955 FC 387 = 7
DLR (FC) 385]. The appellants in that case were
proceeded against under the Sindh Control of
Goondas Act, 1952. They were declared as goondas
were directed to furnish heavy security but they hav-
ing failed to give security, were confined to prison.
Against their detention in prison, they approached
the Sind Chief Court by an application under section
491 of the Code of Criminal Procedure, 1898 alleg-
ing that their imprisonment was wrongful and
prayed that they be set at liberty. Some of the peti-
tioners moved revision petitions under section 17 of
the aforesaid Act before the Chief Court.

85. By means of the Emergency Powers
Ordinance, 1955 (Ordinance No. 1X of 1955) issued

under section 42 of the Government of India Act,
1935 the Governor-General sought to validate all
those Acts by indicating his assent with retrospec-
tive operation. The ground urged before the Chief
Court on which their imprisonment was alleged to
be illegal was that the Governor’s Act under which
action had been taken against them was invalid
because it was passed by the Governor in exercise of
the powers which were conferred on him by a
Proclamation issued by the Governor-General under
section 92A of the Government of India Act, 1935,
which section had been inserted in the Government
of India Act, 1935 by an Order of the Governor-
General under section 9 of the Indian Independence
Act, 1947. It was contended that this action of the
Governor-General was ultra vires the provisions of
the aforesaid section 9. The contention was repelled
by the Chief Court and the detentions of the peti-
tioners were held legal.

86. The matter came up in appeal before the
Federal Court where the questions requiring deter-
mination were as under :—
<br>
“(1) Whether the Governor-General could
by an Ordinance validate the Indian
Independence (Amendment) Act, 1948; and
<br>
(2) Whether the Governor-General could
give assent to constitutional legislation made by
the Constituent Assembly with retrospective
effect”.

It was held that a legislature could not validate
an invalid law if it did not possess the power to leg-
islate on the subject to which the invalid law related,
the principle governing validation being that valida-
tion being itself legislation one could not validate
what one could not legislate upon. The essence of a
federal legislature was that it was not a sovereign
legislature competent to make laws on all matters, in
particular it could not, unless specifically empow-
ered by the Constitution, legislate on matters which
were assigned by the Constitution to other bodies.
Nor was it competent to remove the limitations
imposed by the Constitution on its legislative pow-
crs. The power of the legislature of the dominion for


the purpose of making provision as to the constitu-,
tion of the Domination could, under Subsection (1)
of section 8 of the Indian Independence Act. 1949
be exercised only by the Constituent Assembly, and
that such power could not be exercised by that
Assembly when it functioned as the Federal
Legislature within the limits imposed upon it by the
Government of India Act, 1935. The Governor.
General could not by an Ordinance, repeal ANY pro.
vision of the Indian Independence Act, 1947 o; the
Government of India Act, 1935 and assume Unto
himself all powers of legislation.

87. Since the Amendment Act of 1948 was not
presented to the Governor-General for his assent. it
did not have the effect of extending the date from
31st March, 1948 to 31st March, 1949 and that since
section 92A was added to the Government of India
Act, 1935 after 31st March, 1948, 1t never became g
valid provision of that Act. Thus, the Governor-
General had no authority to act under section 92A
and the Governor derived no power to Icgislate from
a Proclamation under that section. Accordingly, the
Sind Goondas Act was ultra vires and no action
under it could be taken against the appellants. That
being so, it was argued, the detention of the appel-
lants in jail was illegal.

88. The Federal Court held that the Acts men-
tioned in the Schedule to the above Order could not
be validated by the Governor-General under section
42 of the 1935, Act nor could retrospective effect be
given to them. A noleworthy fact was that the
Constituent Assembly, having already been dis-
solved by the Governor-General by a Proclamation
on October 24, 1954 had ceased to function and no
legislature competent to validate these Acts was i?
existence. In conclusion, the Court observed as:—

“it might have been expected that con
formably with the attitude taken before us by
the responsible counsel for the Crown the first
concern of the Government would have been
bring into existence another representative bods
to exercise the powers of Constituent Assembly
so that all invalid legislation could have bee!
immediately validated by the new body, Such!
course would have been consistent with the con-
stitution practice in relation to such a situation.
fvents, however, show that other counsels have
since prevailed. The Ordinance contains no ref-
erence to elections, and all that the learned
Advocate General can say is that there intended
to be held.”

89, Next case of significant relevance is the
Reference HE The Governor-General reported in
PLD 1955 FC 435. The Federal Court having held
in Maulvi Tamizuddin Khan case that assent of the
Governor-General was necessary to all laws passed
by the Constituent Assembly, the Governor-General
sought to validate such Acts by indicating his ascent,
with retrospective operation, by means of the
Emergency Powers Ordinance, 1955(Ordinance No,
IX of 1955) issued under section 42 of the
Government of India Act, 1935. The Federal Court
in Usif Patel s case, however, declared that the Acts
mentioned in the Schedule to that Ordinance could
not be validated under section 42 of the Government
of the India Act, 1935, nor could retrospective effect
be given to them. A noteworthy fact was that the
Constituent Assembly had ceased to function, hav-
ing already been dissolved by the Governor-General
by a Proclamation on 24th October 1954, and no
legislature competent to validate these Acts was in
existence.

90. The Governor-General made a reference to
the Federal Court under section 213 of the
Government of India Act, 1935 asking for the
Court’s opinion on the question whether there was
any provision in the Constitution or any rule of law
applicable to the situation by which the Governor-
General could, by Order or otherwise, declare that
all orders made, decisions taken, and other acts done
under those laws, should be valid and enforceable
and those laws, which could not without danger to
the State be removed from the existing legal system,
Should be treated as part of the law of the land until
the question of their validation was determined by
the new Constituent Convention.

91. The answer returned by the Federal Court
(by majority) was that in the situation presented by

the Reference, the Governor-General has, during the
interim period, the power under the common law of
civil or state necessity of retrospectively validating
the laws listed in the Schedules to the Emergency
Powers Ordinance, 1955, and all those laws, until
the question of their validation was decided upon by
the Constituent Assembly, where, during the afore-
said period, valid and enforceable in the same way
as if they had been valid from the date on which they
purported to come into force.

92. In Dossos case the respondents in one of
the appeals were tried by a Jirga (council of elders)
under the provisions of the Frontier Crimes
Regulation, 1901 (FCR) and convicted and sen-
tenced under different provisions of the Pakistan
Penal Code, 1860. They filed applications before the
High Court for a writ of habeas corpus and certiorari
on the ground that the provisions of the FCR
enabling the executive authorities to refer a criminal
case to a Council of Elders were void under Article
4 of the Constitution of the Islamic Republic of
Pakistan, 1956. The High Court accepted the con-
tention and held that the provisions of FCR could be
enforced under subsection (4) of section 1 (ibid)
only against Pathans and Baluchis and against such
other persons the local government may notify and
as this was not a reasonable classification, those pro-
visions were u/tra vires Article 5 of the Constitution.
The convictions and sentences were set aside, and
the respondents were ordered to be treated as under
trial prisoners, it being left to the government to
refer their cases to a Court of law. On appeals filed
by the State before the Federal Court against the
impugned orders of the High Court, the validity of
the exercise of power by the High Court was
adjudged in the context of the actions of 7th
October, 1958. What happened was that by
Proclamation of that data, the President of Pakistan
annulled the Constitution of 1956, dismissed the
Central Cabinet and the Provincial Cabinets and dis-
solved the National Assembly and both Provincial
Assemblies. Simultaneously, Martial Law was
declared throughout the country and Commander-in
Chief of the Pakistan Army was appointed as the
Chief Martial Law Administrator. Three days later,
the President promulgated the Laws (Continuance in
Force) order, 1958, the general effect of which was
the validation of laws other than the late Constitu-
tion, that were in force before Proclamation, and
restoration of the jurisdiction of all Courts including
the Supreme Court and High Courts. The Order con-
tained the further direction that the country, there-
after to be known as Pakistan and not the Islamic
Republic of Pakistan, should be governed as nearly
as may be in accordance with the late Constitution.

93. Under Clause (7) of Article 2 of the Laws
(Continuance in Force) Order 1958, all writ peti-
tions pending in High Courts seeking enforcement
of fundamental rights stood abated. The Court held
that if the Constitution was destroyed by a success-
ful revolution, the validity of the prevalent laws
depended upon the will of the new law-creating
organ. Therefore, if the new legal order preserved
any one or more laws of the old legal order, then a
writ would lie for violation of the same. As regards
pending applications for writs or writs already
issued but which were either sub judice before the
Supreme Court or required enforcement, the Court
in the light of the Laws (Continuance in Force)
Order, 1958 held that excepting the writs issued by
the Supreme Court after Proclamation and before
the promulgation of the Order, no writ or order for a
writ issued or made after Proclamation shall have
any legal effect unless the writ was issued on the
ground that anyone or more of the laws mentioned
in Article 4 or any other right kept alive by the new
Order had been contravened. |

94. The Supreme Court, on the basis of the the-
ory propounded by Hans Kelsen, accorded legitima-
cy to the assumption of power by General Ayub
Khan holding that coup d’etat was a legitimate
means to bring about change in the government and
particularly so when the new order brought about by
the change had been accepted by the people. It was
held that where a Constitution and the national legal
order under it was disrupted by an abrupt political
change not within the contemplation of the
Constitution, then such a change would be a revolu-

tion and its legal effect would not only be the
destruction of the Constitution but also the validity

of the national legal order, irrespective of how or by
whom such a change was brought about. In the
result, in accordance with the judgment of the
majority, the proceedings for writs in each of these
cases were held to have abated. The result Was that
the directions made and the writs issued by the High
Court were set aside. However, in 1972. in Asma
Jilani’s case, the details of which will be discussed
later on, the above view was overruled by Pakistan
Supreme Court.


95. Now coming to the cases of Halima

Khatun, Joynal Abedin, Ehteshamuddin and Nasir-
uddin where the status of the said Proclamations
dated August 15, 1975, November and 29 of 197§
and Martial Law Regulations and Orders have been
considered, the High Court Division regarding
Halima Khatuns case stated as follows:— .

The first is the case of Halima Khatun \s
Bangladesh 30 DLR (SC) 207. In the said case.
the legality of the Proclamations etc. was not
the issue but inclusion of a property in the list of
abandoned properties was challenged in the
High Court. The Rule was discharged on the
ground that the question as to whether the rele-
vant property was abandoned or not is a disput-
ed question of fact. On appeal question arose
before the Appellate Division, whether in view
of the provisions of the Abandoned Properties
(Supplementary Provisions) Regulation 1977.
(MLR No. VII of 1977) the aforesaid writ pett-
tion abated. This appeal was decided on January
4,1978. Bangladesh was at that time under
Martial Law. After considering the Proclama-
tions, MLRs and MLOs and also the Constitution
including Article 7, Fazle Munim, J. (as his
Lordship then was), observed at para-18 :

" ...... what appears from the

Proclamation of August 20, 1975 is that with the
declaration of Martial Law in Bangladesh 0”
August 15, 1975, Mr Khondker Mushtaque
Ahmed who became the President of
Bangladesh assumed full powers of the
Government and by Clause (d) and (c) of the
Proclamation made the Constitution of
Bangladesh, which was allowed to remain in
force, subordinate to the Proclamation and any
Regulation or order ai may be made by the
President in pursuance thereof. In Clause (hy the
power to amend the Proclamation vas provided.
Jt may be true that whenever there would be any
conflict between the Constitution and the
Proclamation or a Regulation or an Order the
intention, a5 appears from the language
employed, does not seem to concede such supe-
riority to the Constitution. Under the Proclama-
tion, Which contains the aforesaid clauses, the
Constitution has Jost its character as the
Supreme law of the country. There is no doubt,
an express declaration in Article 7(2)of the
Constitution to the following effect :

“This Constitution is, as the solemn expres-
sion of the will of the people, the Supreme law
of the Republic and if any other law is inconsis-
tent with this Constitution that other law shall to
the extent of the inconsistency be void.”
Ironically cnough, this Article, though. still
exists, must be taken to have lost some of its
Importance and efficacy. In view of clauses (d),
(c) and (g) of the Proclamation the supremacy
of the Constitution as declared in that Article is
no longer unqualified. In spite of this Article, no
Constitutional provision can claim to be sacro-
sanct and immutable. The present Constituti-
onal provision may however, claim superiority
to any law other than a Regulation or Order
made under the Proclamation.”

96. Fazle Munim, J, held that the Constitution
of Bangladesh was made subservient and subordi-
_. Hate to the Proclamations, MLRs and MLOs.

According to the High Court Division in view
of the above Judgment—
<br>
(i) Under the Proclamations, the
Constitution Jost its character as the supreme
_law of the Republic.
<br>
(ii) The Constitution is subordinate to the
Proclamations and the Repulations and Orders

made there under.

<br>
iii. Constitution is superior to any law
other than a Regulation or Order made under the
Proclamation”’.

97. Regarding Haji Joynal Abedin’ case 32 DLR

(AD) 1/0 the High Court Division stated as follows:

In this case a writ petition was filed chal-
lenging the legality of the order of conviction
passed by the Special Martial Law Court. The
legality of Proclamations etc. was not the issue
in that case. The High Court Division declared
the said order of conviction and sentence was
without lawful authority and of no legal effect.

Leave was granted, inter alia, to consider
as to whether in view of the Proclamation dated
August 20, 1975, the High Court Division acted
within its jurisdiction in issuing the writ.

After tracing the history of the Proclama-
tion of Martial Law, declared on August 20,
1975 at page-16 and 17 of the Report, Ruhul
Islam, J, held at para-18, page- 122:

‘From a consideration of the features
noted above it leaves no room for doubt that
the Constitution though not abrogated, was
reduced to a position subordinate to the
Proclamation, inasmuch as, the unamended
and unsuspended constitutional provisions
were kept in force and allowed to continue
subject to the Proclamation and Martial Law
Regulation or orders and other orders; and
the Constitution was amended from time to
time by issuing Proclamation. In the face of
the facts stated above I find it difficult to
accept the arguments advanced in support of
the view that the Constitution as such 1s still
in force as the supreme law of the country,
untrammeled by the Proclamation and
Martial Law Regulation. .............. ”

Ruhul Islam J, then at. para-19: page-|22-23

held:

............. So long the Constitution is in force
as the Supreme law of the country, any act done
or Proceeding taken by a person purporting to
function in connection with the affairs of the
Republic or of a local authority may be made the
Subject matter of review by High Court in exer-
cis¢ of its writ jurisdiction. The moment the
country is put under Martial Law, the above
noted constitutional provision along with other
civil laws of the country loses its superior posi-
tion”,

Ruhul Islam, J very specifically spelt out that
the Constitution was reduced to a position sub-
ordinate to the Proclamations, MLRs and MLOs.

This opinion of the Appellate Division was
given on Decembers 20, 1978. At that time the
country was under Martial Law”’.

According to the High Court Division by the
above judgment ....
<br>
(i) The Constitution was reduced to a posi-
tion subordinate to the Proclamation.
<br>
(ii) The unamended unsuspended Constitu-
tional provisions were allowed to continue sub-
Ject to the Proclamations and MLRs and MLOs.
<br>
(iii) The Constitution was amended from
time to time by issuing Proclamations.
<br>
(iv) The moment the country is put under
Martial Law, the Constitution looses its superior
position”.
<br>
98. Regarding the next case i.e. the case of Kh.
Ehteshamuddin Ahmed vs Bangladesh, 33 DLR
(AD) /54 the High Court Division held as fol-
lows:—

In this case a writ petition was filed chal-
lenging the proceedings in passing the Judgment
and Order of conviction passed by the Special
Martial Law Court. The Proclamation etc. were
not challenged. The High Court Division sum-
marily rejected the writ petition by an order
dated June, 13, 1979, on the ground of ouster of
Jurisdiction by MLR 1 of 1975.

By this time, Proclamations Were revoked
and the Martial Law was Withdrawn.

Leave was granted, jnre;- alia, to Consider as 
to whether the proceeding of the Special Martial
Law Court could be examined by the High court
Division after passing of the Fifth Amendment
of the Constitution. 

In this case, the vires of the Fifth Amendment
was not challenged. This position was Admitted
by the learned Advocates of both the Sides, the
Court considered the legality of the Proceedings
before the Special Martial Law Court When thy
country was under Martial Law. The Judgment
of the Appellate Division was given on March
27, 1980.

At that time although Martial Law was with.
drawn still its dark shadows apparently loomed
large over the country and its Constitution, as
found by the Court. His Lordship Ruhul Islam.
J., in considering Article 7, held at para-16 page-
163:

“It is true that Article 7(2) declares the
Constitution as the Supreme Law of’ the
Republic and if any other law is inconsistent
with the Constitution that other law shall, to the
extent of the inconsistency, be void, but the
Supremacy of the Constitution cannot by any
means Compete with the Proclamation issued by
the Chief Martial Law”.

99. His Lordship then at Para -18 page-163

held:

“18. In that case, on the question of High
Court’s power under the Constitution to issue °
writ against the Martial Law Authority or
Martial Law Courts, this Division has given the
answer that the High Courts being creature
under the Constitution with the Proclamation 0!
Martial Law and the Constitution allowed to
remain operative subject to the Proclamation
and Martial Law Regulation, it loses its superi
or power to issue writ against the Martial Law

Authority or Martial Law Courts.......

****** Result for Image/Page 1 ******
100. His Lordship then at para-25, page-1 66
furthcr held:
"25. Before I proceed further it may be
mentioned that in the present case neither the
authority of the person who proclamation Martial
Law nor the vires of the Martial Law Regulation
was or could bc challenged at the bar excepting
arguing on the question or supretnacy of the
Constitution over the Proclamations and Martial
Law Regulations. Since the authority of the
Chief Martial Law Administrator is not chal-
lenged and the vires of the relevant Martial Law
Regulation is also not challenged, I do not find
any good reason making reference to Asma
jilani's• case".
101. The conunent of the High Court Division
on the above judgment is that the Appellate Division found:
<br>
"(i) The Constitution continued subject to
the Proclamations.<br>
(ii) The Suprelnacy of the Constitution can-
not by any means compete with
the <br>
Proclamation.
(iii) The Chief Martial Law Administrator
would not be deemed to be a person holding an
office of profit in the service of the People's
Republic of Bangladesh. <br>
(iv) The High Court lost its superior power
to issue writ against the Martial Law Authority
or Martial Law Courts". <br>
' 'From the above Judgment it is apparent
that even after lifting of the Martial Law, its pro-
visions remained supreme and on the face of the
MLRs, the Constitution was relegated even fur-
ther to the back-seat. Although at that time the
Martial Law was not there but even then the
Constitution was read subject to the Martial
Law and was made to recoil on the face of the
bare shadow of the MLRs".
''It is apparent from the above Judgement
that the effect of the Proclamation was that the
Constitution is supreme only when the Martial
Law is not near by and even long after the lift-
ing the Martial law, on the Cace of its bare
shadow, the Constitution with its S supremacy•
a worthless sheaf of papers, Whether
we like it or not the status of the Constitution
Was reduced to such an ignoble shambles by the
Proclamations, the MLRs and the MLOs, which
would have blushed even Henry VIII or Louis
X I V. During the reign or Henry VIII in the 16th
Century, the Proclamations were issued by the
King but in pursuance of an Act of Parliament
and no prerogative right to issue proclamation
was allowed even to the King of England by the
Chief Justice Coke four hundred years ago in
1610.
102. Regarding Nasiruddin's case 32 DLR
(AD) 216, the High Court Division found as fol-
lows:—
This case was decided on 14-4-1980. It is
also in respect or an abandoned property. It
modified the effect of the decision of the earlier
Halbna Khatun's case to some extent but the
observations of Fazle Muni111, .J,
in respect of
the status of Martial Law vis-a-vis the
Constitution made in
the said decision,
remained unaltered. Kelnaluddin Hossain, Cj,
however, held at para-10, page 221 :
"It is to be observed that when an authority
is vested with a jurisdiction to do certain acts
and in the exercise of that jurisdiction he does it
wrongly or irregularly the action can be said to
be done within the purported exercise of his
jurisdiction. But an act which is manifestly
without jurisdiction, such as the property which
not being an abandoned property within the
meaning of Presidential Order 16 of 1972 is
declared to be so, or in case of judicial or quasi
judicial act which is coram non judice, the use
of the expression 'purported exercise' in the val-
idating clause of Fifth Amendment 01' the
Constitution cannot give such act the protection
from challenge, it being ultra vires. It is true
malafide act is also not protected,
but then
malafide is to be pleaded with particulars con-
Stituting such malafide and established by
copent materials before the Court.”
<br>
................................................................................
..............................................................................
<br>

In this connection it should also be noted
that the case of Kh. Ehteshamuddin Ahmed vs
Bangladesh, 33 DLR (AD) 154 was decided on
27-3-1980 and the case of Nasiruddin vs
Government of Bangladesh 32 DLR (AD) 216

was decided on 14-4-1980. Both the cases were
decided after the Fifth Amendment was passed
on April 6, 1979, by the Second Parliament.

A question although was not raised but yet
may arise that since those two cases were decid-
ed after the enactment of the Fifth Amendment
whether it can be said that the Appellate
Division approved the Fifth Amendment, at
least impliedly? However, it is not, since the
vires of the Fifth Amendment was not under
challenge in any of those two appeals, even
indirectly. The issues involved in those two
cases were nowhere near the Fifth Amendment.

103. In Ehteshamuddin's case the issues were:
<br>
“(i) Whether the proceedings of the Special
Martial Law Court could be examined after the
enactment of the Fifth Amendment and _ the
Proclamation made on April, 7, 1979 by the
CMLA, withdrawing the Martial Law and
revoking the earlier Proclamations.
<br>
(ii) The extent of protection given under the
Fifth Amendment. |
<br>
(iii) Whether the decision of the
Government can be called in question under
Article 102 of the Constitution despite the
Proclamation of April 6, 1979”.

104. I is thus apparent that the vires of the

Fifth Amendment to the Constitution was not under
challenge in any of the above cases. This is also
admitted by the learned Additional Attorney-
General and also the learned Advocate for. the

respondent No. 53. Besides, at Paragraph-25 of the
Judgment it 1s categorically stated that neither the
authority of the person who proclaimed Martial Law
nor the vires of the Martial Law Regulations was
challenged in the said case. In Nasiruddin ' case , the
Issue was Whether the writ abated. in View of sub-
paragraph (1) of paragraph 5 read with paragraph 4
of Martial Law Regulation No. VII of 1977. This
case has got no nexus with the Fifth Amendment

105. As it appears the High Coun Division
also stated that similar question as to Validity of
Martial Law was also faced by Hamoodur Rahman
CJ in Asma Jilanis case wherein his Lordship con-
sidering the case of Muhammad Ismail vs State
PLD 1969 SC 24] in which the judgment was deliv-
ered again by himself, and also the case of Mia
Fazal Ahmed vs State PLD 1969 SC 24] held that in
those cases no question was raised as to the Validly
of the Martial Law Order or of the Provisional
Constitution Order and therefore it is incorrect to
say that the Supreme Court had given any legal
recognition to the regime of General Yahya Khan.

106. We are also of the view that simply
because the laws made by the Martial Law
Authorities and actions taken under it were consid-
ered by this Division in the cases of Halima Khatun
Joynal Abedin, Ehteshamuddin and Nasiruddin and
in those cases Martial Law being not declared ultra
vires the Constitution, those laws will not attain
validity. Further, as pointed out earlier, in none of
those case, the invalidity of the Fifth Amendment
was challenged and so those cases cannot operate as
precedent for the validity of the Fifth Amendment.
Accordingly there is no substance to the submission
of the petitioners that the decisions in the above
cases touching the actions of the Martial Law
authorities provide some binding precedents under
Article 111 of the Constitution and so the actions of
martial Law authorities cannot be challenged in the
Court. In order to apply the provision of Article 111
an issue must be raised and deliberated upon and
decided before it can operate as a binding precedent
Further what is binding as a law is the ratio of a
decision and not the finding of a fact or the conclu-


sion reached by the Court. as held in the case of
Dalbir Singh vs India, 1979 AIR 1384. Moreover, as

held in the case of Bangladesh vs Mizanur Rahman,
52 DLR (AD) 149 this Division having the power of
review is not bound by a view earlier taken by this
division.

107. Further the role of stare decisis in consti-
tutional interpretation is also very insignificant par-
ticularly when the earlier decision is manifestly
wrong. In this regard in Asma Jilanis case (supra) at
page 139, 168-169, the Chief Justice quoted with

approval, the statement in Corpus Juris Secumdum,
which is as follows:—

“The doctrine of stare decisis cannot be
invoked to sustain, as authority, a decision

which is in conflict with the provisions of the
state Constitution”.

108. As regards the stare decisis, Halsburys
Laws of England states as follows:—

“In general the House of Lords will not
overrule a long established course of decisions
except in plain cases where serious inconven-
ience or injustice would follow from perpetuat-
ing an erroneous construction or ruling of law.
The same considerations do not apply where the
decision, although followed, had been frequent-
ly questioned and doubted. In such a case it may
be overruled by any Court of superior jurisdic-
tion. When old authorities are plainly wrong,
and especially where the subsequent course of
judicial decisions has disclosed weakness in the
reasoning on which they were based and practi-
cal injustice in the consequences that must flow
from them, it is the duty of the House of Lords
to overrule them”’.

109. Further this doctrine of precedent, how-

ever Cannot control questions involving involving the con- 
struction and interpretation of the Constitution or at
least does not apply with the same force to the deci-
sions on constitutional questions as to other deci-
sions. Even though the previous decisions will not
be entirely disregarded and may, in case of doubt,
control the views of the Court.

110. Henry J. Abraham’s in his “The Judicial
Process” quoted Douglas J of the US Supreme Court
saying that—

“a judge looking a constitutional decision
may have compulsions to revere past history
and accept what was once written; but he
remembers above all also that it is. the
“Constitution which he swore to support and
defend, not the gloss which his predecessor may
have put on it”.

111. In dealing with ratio decidendi to operate
as a precedent, Salmond in jurisprudence }2th
Edition page 183 observed:—

“Where there are several different judg-
ments, as in a case on appeal, the ratio must be
ascertained from the judgments of those in
favour of the final decision. A dissenting Judg-
ment, valuable and important though it may be,
cannot count as part of the ratio, for it played no
part in the Court’s reaching their decision. It
may happen in an appeal Court that all the
judges concur in the decision but each one gives
different reasons for it. In such a case one can
only follow the advice of Lord Dunedin, who
said that if it is not clear what the ratio deciden-
di was, then it is no part ofa later tribunal’s duty
to spell out with great difficulty a ratio deciden-
di in order to be bound by it.”

112. The petitioners, relying on the views of
Shahabuddin Ahmed, J expressed in Anwar
Hossain s case to the effect that in spite of these vital
changes from 1975 by destroying some of the basis
structures of the Constitution nobody challenged
them in Court after revival of the Constitution and
consequently they were accepted by the people and
by their acquiescence have become part of the

Constitution, submitted that in view of the principle
of acquiescence the writ petition is not maintainable.

113. However, the above view does not depict
the correct law as can be seen from the number of
decisions cited hereinabove and secondly this state-
ment is simply an obiter diclum as it was Made
while dealing with the eight Amendment and the



  Fifth Amendment was not in issue in the above deci-


sion and the observation was also uncalled for and


thirdly, no other judges in the said case agreed with


the said observation and as such it cannot be treated


as ratio decidendi so as to have binding force under


article 111. It may be noted here that four learned


judges heard the appeal and out of them only MH


Rahman, J. concurred with Shahabuddin J’s deci-


sion that Eight Amendment was unconstitutional


and not with the above quoted observation of


Shahabuddin J regarding Fifth Amendment.





114. The next submission of the petitioners


that the Fifth Amendment have been accepted by the


people and so it cannot be challenged in view of the


principle of waiver and acquiescence by delay.





In this regard the High Court Division held as


follows :





“Let us now consider the contention that


whether the vires of the Martial Law


Proclamation etc. and the Fifth Amendment, has


become barred by waiver and acquiescence, due


to long delay in challenging those provisions. It


was further contended that this delay shows that


the people of Bangladesh had already accepted


the Fifth Amendment, ratifying the Martial Law


Proclamations etc. This proposition is anything


but correct. Conclusions or inferences based on


the facts and circumstances may vary with the


change of social out-look or political situation


but what is legally wrong remains wrong forev-





er.





Similarly, if there is a violation of law, it


remains a violation for all time to come with


consequential and inevitable results. The law of


adverse possession has got no application in


case of unconstitutional acts and events. One


must not loose sight that the Constitution is


supreme and every person in the Republic, be


he is a servant of the Republic or an ordinary


citizen, owe his unquestionable, unqualified and


absolute loyalty to the Constitution. Any


attempt to deface the Constitution or to make it


subservient tantamount to the offence of sedi-


tion of worst kind. The Fifth Amendment


sought to legalize such offences committed by


the Martial Law Authorities and the learned the


Advocates for the respondents submitted that j,


cannot be questioned, because  thy,,


Proclamations etc. were made by the Martial


Law Authorities, that the Fifth Amendment


itself provided that the ratification, confirmation


and the validation of those Proclamations etc


and the actions taken thereon cannot be ques.


tioned before any Court, that it is beyond ques.


tion because nobody challenged those in all


these years, as such, deemed to be waived or


acquiesced, Those arguments are neither legal


nor logical. Those arguments would not have


been accepted even before the Star Chamber not


to speak in the dawn of 21st century.”





115. Further, the answer in this respect has


been aptly given by Denning LJ in Qacker vs


Packer (1953) 2 All ER 127 at page — 129 H.





“ What is the argument on the other side ?


Only this that no case has been found in which


it has been done before. That argument does not


appeal to me in the least. If we never do any-


thing which has not been done before, we shall


never get anywhere .The law will stand still


while the rest of the world goes on, and that will


be bad for both”.





Accordingly, we are also of the view that it is


far, far better thing that we do now, what should be


done in the interest of justice, even it was not done


earlier.





116. We have already held that making of the


Constitution subordinate and subservient to the


Martial Law Proclamations, Regulations and Orders


are absolutely illegal, void and non-est in the eye of


law. So any attempt to legalise this illegality in any


manner or method and by any Authority oF


Institution, how high so ever, is also void and non-


est and remains so forever.





117. Further, if the Constitution is wronged. It


is a grave offence of unfathomed enormity commit


ted against each and every citizens of the Republic,





            
 it is a continuing and recurring wrong committed


against the Republic itself. It remains a wrong


against future generations of citizens. As such, there


vant be any plea of waiver or acquiescence in


respect of unconstitutionality of a provision or an


Act of Parliament.





118. As stated earlier the United States of


America during its long and eventful history, also


passed through many a turbulent periods but none of


its amendments was made for anything but further


advancement of civilization and humanity but not to


legalize illegal acts. Its purpose is not to engineer or


as a device to hide the illegal activities of usurpers


or dictators but for achieving further improvements,


further refinements of the constitutional position of


the citizens of a Republic. This is the true spirit for


amendment of a Constitution, the supreme law of


the Republic. If the Court finds that the amendment


is affected for a collateral and illegal purpose, the


Court will not be slow to declare it so in exercise of


its high constitutional duties ordained upon it. There


is no law of limitation in challenging an unconstitu-


tional action, conduct, behaviour or acts. In such a


situation, the cause of action is recurring till such


acts are judicially considered. Constitutional ques-


tions are of utmost national as well as of legal inter-


est and mere collateral observation does not carry


much of an importance than a bare passing remark


without any conviction.





119. In the case of Lois P Myers vs United


States 272 US 52 (1926) the Tenure of Office Act of


1867 and an Act of Congress of 1876, were declared


invalid after more than 50 years after its enactment.





120. In the case of Proprietary Articles Trade


Association vs Attorney-General of Canada 1931


All ER 277 PC, the vires of Combines Investigation


~ Act (1927) and Section 498 of the Criminal Code


(1927) were under challenge. In considering the





question, Lord Atkin for the Board held at page-


280A;





“Their Lordships entertain no doubt that


lime alone will not validate an Act which, when


challenged, is found to be wlfra vires; nor will a


history of a gradual series of advances till this


boundary is finally crossed avail to protect the


ultimate encroachment.”





121. In the case of Grace Brothers Proprietary


Limited vs Commonwealth (1 946) 72 CLR 269. the


validity of the land Acquisition Acts 1906-1936


were challenged. In deciding the issue in the High


Court of Australia, Dixon J. held at page- 289:





" ........... the plaintiffs next proceed to


impugn the validity of the Lands Acquisition


Act 1906-1936 itself. Time does not run in


favour of the validity of legislation. If it is w/tra


vires, it cannot gain legal strength from long


failure on the part of lawyers to perceive and set


up its invalidity. At best, lateness in an attack


upon the constitutionality of a statute is but a


reason for exercising special caution in examin-


ing the arguments by which the attack is sup-


ported.”





122. In the case of Frederick Walz vs Tux


Commission of New York 25 L Ed 2d 697 (397 US


664) (1970), grant of property tax exemptions under


the New York Constitution, to religions organiza-


tions were challenged on the ground of violation of


First Amendment of US Federal Constitution. In


deciding the issue, Chief Justice Burger held at para


— 12, page — 706:





“[12] It is obviously correct that no one


acquires a vested or protected right in violation


of the Constitution by long use, even when that


span of time covers our entire national existence


and indeed predates it”.





123. In the case of Motor General Traders vs


State of Andhra Pradesh AIR 1984 SC 121, in con-


sidering the validity of section 32(b) of AP


Buildings Control Act of violative at Article 14 of


the Constitution of India, Venkataramiah, J., held at


para —24:





“24. It is argued that since the impugned


provision has been in existence for over twenty


three years and its validity has once been upheld


by the High Court, this Court should not pro-





            



nounce upon its validity at this late stage. There


are two answers to this proposition. First, the


very fact that nearly twenty three years are Over


from the date of the enactment of the impugned


provision and the discriminations is allowed to


be continued unjustifiably for such a long time


is a ground of attack in these case........The sec-


ond answer to the above contention is that mere


lapse of time does not lend constitutionality to a


provision which is otherwise bad. Time does not


run in favour of legislation. If it is ultra vires, it


cannot gain legal strength from long failure on


the part of lawyers to perceive and set up its


invalidity. Albeit, lateness in an attack upon the


constitutionality of a statute is not a reason for


exercising special caution in examining the


arguments by which the attack is supported”


(See W. A. Wvnes: ‘Legislative, Executive and


Judicial Powers in Australia’, Fifth Edition, p.


33). We are constrained to pronounce upon the


validity of the impugned provision at this late


stage.....because the garb. of constitutionality


which it may have possessed earlier become


worm out and its unconstitutionality is now


brought to a successful challenge.”





124. These well reasoned decisions only con-


firm our view that the plea of waiver or acquies-


cence is no ground in considering the of vires of a


constitutional amendment or for that matter any law.


Validity of an Act of Parliament effecting an amend-


ment of the Constitution is to be considered on its


own merit as to whether such an amendment vio-


lates the Constitution itself even on a remote manner


or not, but delay in challenging any such amend-


ment, on its own, is not a valid objection to such a


challenge.





125. Regarding the submission of the petition-:


ers that the Appellate Division in Anwar Hossain’s


case already refused to consider the past amend-


ments of the Constitution, which affected the basis


structure of the Constitution, the High Court held as


follows:—





Referring to an observation of Shahab-


uddin Ahmed, J (as his Lordship then was), Mr


Akhtar Imam, Advocate, on behalf Of the


respondent No. 3, submitted that the Appellate


Division in Anwar. Hossain Chowdhury's case


already refused to consider the past amend-


ments of the Constitution which had admittedly


destroyed the basic structure of the Constitu-


tion, as such, the learned Advocate submitted


that it is now too late in the day after a delay, of


about 26 years since the Constitution (Fifth


Amendment) Act was passed, to challenge its,


vires in view of the above decision of the,


Appellate Division.








The learned Advocate in effect wanted to


impress upon us that the vires of the


Constitution (Fifth Amendment) Act, 1979, hag


already been duly considered by the Appellate


Division in the case of Anwar Hossain Chow-


dhury etc. vs Bangladesh 1989 BLD (Spl) l and


since the Court found on the basis of the deci-


sion in Golak Nath’s case that the said constitu-


tional amendment was accepted by the people


of Bangladesh and became part of the


Constitution by general acquiescence, the legal-


ity of the said Constitution (Fifth Amendment)


Act, cannot now be re-opened all over again.





These contentions raised on behalf of the


respondents, on the face of it have no legs to


stand on. These contentions are fallacious, mis-


conceived and have no substance. However, we


shall deal with these contentions in some details


to repel any confusion in these regards.





The main plank of the above noted argu-


ments are based on an observation of Shaha-


buddin Ahmed, J, in the case of Anwar Hossain


Chowdhury etc. vs Bangladesh 1989 BLD (Spl)


1. The said observations were made at para-33


of his Lordship’s Judgment:—


<br>


“In spite of these vital changes from 19?


by destroying some of the basic structures of the


Constitution, nobody challenged them 10 Court


after revival of the Constitution; consequent.


they were accepted by the people, and by then


acquiescence have become part of the Constitu-

    tion.       In the case of Golak Nath, the Indian


Supreme Court found three past amendments of


their Constitution invalid on the ground of alter-


ation of the basic structures, but refrained from


declaring them void in order prevent chaos in


the national life and applied the Doctrine of


prospective Invalidation for the future. In our


case also the past amendments, which were not


challenged, have become _ part of the


Constitution by general acquiescence. But the


fact that basic structures of the Constitution


were changed in the past cannot be, and is not,


accepted as a valid ground to answer the chal-


Jenge to future amendment of this nature, that is,


the Impugned Amendment may be challenged


on the ground that it has altered the basic struc-


ture of the Constitution.”





On the basis of this observation, the learned


Advocates for the respondents stoutly submitted


that the Fifth Amendment has been accepted by


the people of Bangladesh by acquiescence and


is now part of the Constitution, so also Martial


Law culture and jurisprudence and cannot now


its validity be challenged all over again. The


learned Advocates argued these contentions on


the basis of the decision of the Supreme Court


of India in the case of Golak Nath vs State of


Punjab AIR 1967 SC 1643 but without at all


appreciating the context and perspective of the


said decision, as such, it is necessary to recapit-


ulate the said decision and its background.





In Kesavananda Bharat’ case, AIR (SC)


Sikri, CJ explained the matter at para-487 as


follows:—


<br>


“In this connection I may deal with the


argument that the device of Art. 31B and the


Ninth Schedule has up till now been upheld by


this Court and it is now too late to impeach it.


But the point now raised before us has never


been raised and debated before. As Lord Atkin


Observed in Proprietary Articles Trade


Association vs Attorney-General for Canada,


1931 AC 310 at “Their Lordships entertain no


doubt that time alone will not validate an Act





Which when challenged is found to be xtra


vires ; nor will a history of a gradual series of


advances till this boundary is finally crossed


avail to protect the ultimate encroachment.





If any further authority is needed, | may


refer to Attorney-General for Australia vs


Queen and the Boilermakers’ Society of


Australia, 1957 AC 288 at p. 328. The Judicial


Committee, while considering the question


whether certain sections of the Conciliation and


Arbitration Act, 1904-1952 were ultra vires


inasmuch as the Commonwealth Court of


Conciliation and Arbitration had been invested


with the executive powers along with the judi-


cial powers, referred to the point why for a


quarter of century no litigant had attacked the


validity of this obviously illegitimate union, and


observed :


<br>


“Whatever the reason may be, just as there


Was a patent invalidity in the original Act which


for a number of years went unchallenged, so for


a greater number of years an invalidity which to


their Lordships as to the majority of the High


Court has been convincingly demonstrated, has


been disregarded. Such clear conviction must


find expression in the appropriate judgment.”





126. MH Rahman, J, in Anwar Hossain ’s case





at para 442 referring to the self-same submission of


the learned Attorney-General answered as fol-


lows:—


<br>


“442. After referring to the various past


amendment particularly the Fourth Amend-


ment, the learned Attorney-General has submit-


ted that the Constitution has undergone so many


radical changes with regard to the Preamble,


powers of the President and several other


important matters that the doctrine of basic


structure merely evokes an amazement why if it


is such an important principles of law (and it


had already been propounded by the Indian


Supreme Court in 1973) it was not invoked ear-


lier in this Court. I find no force in this con-


tention. Because the principle was not invoked





            



in the past the Court cannot be precluded now


trom considering it.”


<br>


Under the circumstances, the contentions of the


learned Advocates for the respondents that the Fifth


Amendment had already been accepted by the peo-


ple of Bangladesh by acquiescence, have got no sub-


stance.





127. Regarding the question of res judicata it


appears that the order dated 7-6-1994 passed by the


High Court Division in Writ Petition No. 802 of


1994 and the Judgment dated 5-7-1999 passed by


the Appellate Division in Civil Appeal No. 15 of


1997 also show that the Constitution (Fifth





Amendment) Act, 1979, was not judicially consid-


ered earlier. As such, there is no reason as to why we


would not consider not only the legality of the


Martial Law Proclamations etc. but also its legaliza-


tion, ratification, confirmation and validation by


inserting paragraph 18 in the Fourth Schedule to the


Constitution by virtue of section 2 of the


Constitution (Fifth Amendment) Act, 1979, special-


ly when the Rule was issued in that manner and


form.





128. An effort has also been made by the peti-


tioners to apply the principle of estoppel and acqui-


escence to prevent the Fifth Amendment from being


declared w/tra vires but it is a well-established prin-


ciple that estoppel cannot be pleaded against or in


respect of a statute, much less to speak of the


Constitution. Similarly, there cannot be any acquies-





cence to hold valid an otherwise invalid law.





129. The learned counsel of the petitioners


submitted that Article 150 of the Constitution pro-


vides a bar upon the High Court Division to enter-


tain writ in respect of transitional or temporary pro-


Vision.





Article 150 reads as follows :


English Text is:—


<br>


. “150. The transitional and temporary provi-


sions set out in the Fourth Schedule shall have


effect notwithstanding


any other Provisions of


this Constitution.”


<br>


In this regard the High Court Division





held


as follows:— “


<br>


Article 150 of the Constitution Provide


that transitional and temporary Provisions





would be set out in the Fourth schedule. This


provision finds its place almost at the end of the


Constitution. It is preceded by Article 149, the


saving clauses for the existing laws and fol.


lowed by three other Articles, namely, Article


151, which deals with the repeal of certain


President’s Orders, Article 152 narrates the


interpretations of various words and Article 153


provides the date of commencement of the


Constitution, its citation and authenticity.





In pursuance to the above Article in the


Constitution, various transitional and temporary


provisions were set out in details in the Fourth


Schedule to the Constitution.


<br>


The heading of the Fourth Schedule reads - Its English


version is “Transitional and temporary provi-


sions’,


<br>


Both Article 150 and heading of the Fourth


Schedule show that the said Article, as well as


the Fourth Schedule, as set out in pursuance to


Article 150, deals with transitional interim


measures. A brief examination of the provisions


originally contained in the Fourth Schedule


with its English text, would make it clear.





130. Then the High Court Division after quot-


ing paragraph Nos.1 -17 of the Fourth Schedule fur-


ther held as follows:


<br>


...........................................................................................


............................................................................................


<br>





“These are provided in pursuance to Article


150. These provisions were necessary to protect


various laws, actions and decisions, made, taken


Or pronounced since the declaration of


Independence on March 26, 1971.





            
  Jurisprudentially, the necessity for provi-


sions for transitional and temporary provisions


cannot be ignored. The provisions are generally


made for the purpose of transition from the old


Jegal order to a new one to ensure continuity of


the legality of the new State. As such, of neces-


sity, these provisions were made so that no legal


yacuum occurs during the period from the time


when a new nation came into existence till a


Constitution of the said nation is framed.


Obviously these provisions by its very nature,


character and purpose, are of transitional and also


of temporary status and ambit. The facts, circum-


stances and incidents leading to the making of


those interim measures were necessary for the


smooth transition and continuance of the func-


tions of the young Republic of Bangladesh as a


legal entity of a Republic. Those interim measures


were a legal necessity and could not be avoided.


<br>


As such, the purpose of Article 150 is lim-


ited upto the commencement of the Constitution


and of any period mentioned in the Fourth


Schedule. The ambit of this Article cannot be


extended beyond the commencement of the


Constitution or any period mentioned in the


Fourth Schedule. In this regard we must keep in


view the words ‘transitional’ and ‘temporary’


appearing in Article 150. .......... Similarly, the


meaning of the word ‘transition’ according to


The Oxford Dictionary and Thesaurus, Edited


by Sara Tulloch, 1997, is ‘a passing or change


from one place, state, condition, etc., to another


(an age of transition), According to The


Chambers Dictionary, Deluxe Edition, Indian


Edition, 1993, the meaning of the word ‘transi-


tion’ is passage from one place, state, stage, and


style or subject to another.


<br>


........................................................


<br>


..............................................................


<br>


From these words it is so very clear that the


purpose of Article 150 of the Constitutions only


to protect various provisions, functions of dif-


ferent functionaries and all other actions taken


since the declaration of independence and till


the commencement of the Constitution. As


such, the purpose of Article 150 is limited


apparently only for that period and for a specif-


ic purpose.





<br>


........................................................


<br>


...................................................


<br>





It is very true that the Parliament by fol-


lowing the procedure mentioned in Article 142,


may add any provision in the Constitution so


long its basic structure is not disturbed but


Article 150 is a special provision. It deals with


only the transitional and temporary provisions


prior to the commencement of the Constitution.


This provision cannot be used to enlarge the


Fourth Schedule, by addition of the provisions,


which related to the period after the commence-


ment of the Constitution. If necessary, the


Parliament may add any provision to the


Constitution by way of amendment, without,


however, changing its basic character but can-


not enlarge the Fourth Schedule by adding any


provision which is not a provision made during


‘apife sreila’ (‘transitional’) which ended with


the enactment and commencement of the


Constitution on December 16, 1972.





During the period between August 15, 1975


to April 9, 1979, the Constitution was made sub-


ordinate and subservient to the Martial Law


Proclamations etc. The provisions of the


Constitution were changed at the whims and


caprices of the usurpers and dictators. We have


already found that during the said period


democracy was replaced by dictatorship and


since November 1975, on the dissolution of the


National Assembly, Bangladesh lost its republi-


can character. Besides, Bangladesh cannot even





            
            














be considered independent during the said peri-


ed, Earlier, it, was conquered | by the British


Rulers, thereafter it Was under the domination


of the West Pakistanis. But this time ,for all


practical purposes, Bengaladesh was conquered


not by any foreign invaders but by Bengali


speaking Martial Law Authorities.














Article 150 is certainly not meant to be


abused by the usurpers for post facto legaliza-


tion of their illegal and illegitimate activities,


which were beyond the ambit of the Constitu-


tion. As a matter of fact, realizing that all the


Martial Law Proclamations etc. were un-consll-


tutional, they sought to make those legal by


incorporating those provisions as_ part of the


Constitution, But the Fourth Schedule is not


meant for dumping ground for illegal provi-


sions. Rather, what is wrong and illegal remains


so for all time to come. Besides, no one can take


advantage of his own wrongs.





The Constitution is a sacred document,


because it is the embodiment of the will of the


people of Bangladesh. It is not to be treated as a


logbook of Martial rules.





It appears that Paragraph 3A and 18 to the


Fourth Schedule, sought to ratify, confirm, vali-


date and legalise all illegal and illegitimate pro-


visions of Martial Law Proclamations, Martial


Law Regulations and Martial Law Orders. Those


Provisions and the actions taken thereon in viola-


tion of the Constitution, were not only illegal but


seditious acts on the part of the Martial Law


Authorities, as such, by any stretch of imagina-


tion, those provisions and the actions taken


thereon come within the ambit of the word ‘transitional’, As such, those unconstitu-


tional provisions were wrongly and illegally


thrust in to the Fourth Schedule presumably in


the garb of transitional and temporary provisions


and thereby a fraud has been committed on the


Constitution by such amendinents,” °





We are of the view that the High Court Division


unnecessarily dealt with 


Article 150 of the





Constitution. As it appears paragraphs  21 and 22 as


included in the Fourth Schedule are the results : a


Eleventh and Twelfth Amendment Which were


enacted in order to strike down remaining portion


the provisions of the Fourth and Fifth Amendment


As will be discussed later on in details, the Fifth


Amendment which ratified and validated Paragraphs


3A and 18, is ultra vires because it ratified and val-


idated the Martial Law Proclamations, Regulation,


and Orders made by the authorities not recognized


by the Constitution and Article 142 thereof. Since


paragraphs 21 to 22 of the Fourth Schedule Were


accommodated in order to protect the Eleventh and


Twelfth Amendments by way of insertion of para 21


and 22 in the Fourth Schedule, therefore, all obser-


vations made by the High Court Division regarding


Article 150 and Fourth Schedule and also the find


ings thereof, are hereby expunged.











131. It was submitted by the petitioners that


identification of the principles of nationalism,


socialism and secularism by the High Court


Division as the basic structures of the Constitution


has no legal foundation and the same are contrary to


the decision given by the Appellate Division in


<i> Anwar Hossain</i> case.





132. As it appears the High Court Division


prepared a chart showing the paragraphs of original


Preamble and Articles 6, 8, 9, 10, 12, 25, 38 and 14?


of the Constitution and also the amended versions of


those after enactments of the Fifth Amendment. The


above chart along with other particulars as given by


the High Court Division are reproduced below:


<br>


“Before we discuss the above, as already


stated the Proclamations (Amendment) Order


1977 (Proclamations Order No.1 of 1977)


(Annexure-L-1 to the writ petition), replace?


many of the paragraphs in the Preamble and 1


various provisions of the Constitution. The


Proclamation was published in Banglades”


Gazette Extraordinary on April 23, 1977, TH


Proclamation made the following changes " th


Constitution, amongst others”:





            






Original Constitution











1. First Paragraph of the Preamble: We, the





people of Bangladesh, having proclaimed





our Independence on the 26th day of March





1971 and, through a historic struggle for





national liberation, established the independ-





ent, sovereign People’s Republic of Bangla-


desh;





<br>





2, Second Paragraph of the Preamble:


Pledging that the high ideals of nationalism,


socialism, democracy and secularism, which


inspired our heroic people to dedicate them-


selves to, and our brave martyrs to sacrifice


their lives in, the national liberation struggle,


shall be the fundamental principles of the


Constitution;





3. Article-6:





Citizenship of Bangladesh shall be deter-


mined and regulated by law; citizens of


Bangladesh shall be known as Bangalees.





<br>


4. Article-8 :





(1) The principles of nationalism, socialism,


democracy and secularism, together


with the principles derived from them as


set out in this Part, shall constitute the





fundamental principles of state policy.


<br>


(2) The principles set out in this Part shall


be fundamental to the governance of


Bangladesh, shall be applied by the State


in the making of laws, shall be a guide to


the interpretation of the Constitution and


of the other laws of Bangladesh and








            
            Proclamations (Amendment) Order, 1977





1.


<b>First Paragraph of the Preamble</b>: We,


the people of Bangladesh, having pro-


claimed our independence on the 26th day


of March, 1971 and through [a historic war


for national independence], established the


independent, sovereign People’s Republic


of Bangladesh;


<br>


<b>Second Paragraph of the Preamble</b>:


Pledging that the high ideals of absolute


trust and faith in the Almighty Allah,


nationalism, democracy and socialism


meaning economic and social justice,


which inspired our heroic people to dedi-


cated themselves to, and our brave martyrs


to sacrifice their lives in, the war for


national independence, shall be the funda-


mental principles of the Constitution;


<br>


Article-6:





(1) The citizenship of Bangladesh shall be


determined and regulated by law.


<br>


(2) The citizens of Bangladesh shall be


known as Bangladeshis.


<br>


Article-8:





[(1) The principles of absolute trust and


faith in the Almighty Allah, national-


ism, democracy and socialism mean-


ing economic and social justice,


together with the principles derived


from them as set out in this Part, shall


constitute the fundamental principles


of state policy.


<br>


(1A)Absolute trust and faith in’ the


Almighty Allah shall be the basis of


all actions. ]





            
136. Regarding the inclusion of the iii


“BISMILLAH” the High Court Division stated as


follows:


<br>


The words, commas and brackets 'BISMIL-


LAH-AR-RAHMAN-AR-RAHIM (In the name °


Allah, the Beneficent, the Merciful) were inserted


before the word ‘PREAMBLE’ by the above Order.





The High Court Division then, regarding the


first paragraph of the preamble held that in the first


paragraph of the preamble in the original


Constitution the words ‘a historic war for national


independence’ were substituted for the original


words ‘a historic struggle for national liberation’





<br>


.................................................


<br>





137. Regarding the original second paragraph


of the Preamble and its amended version, which


have been shown in the above chart, the High Court


Division held that a plain reading comparing the


original Preamble with the amended one would


unmistakably show certain basic changes as the


original Preamble clearly show that one of the four


fundamental basis of our nation-hood and inspira-


tion of liberation was “secularism” but the amended


Preamble, specially the second paragraph, show that


‘secularism’ was omitted from the Preamble thus


changing the basic character of the Constitution.





138. The High Court Division then quoting the


provisions of original Article 8(1) and its amended


version and sub Article (1A) of the same as shown


in the above chart, held as follows:—





<br>


.................................................................


<br>





It is true that partition was made, more or


less on the basis of religion but India declared





itself as a secular Nation. Mr. Mohammad Ali


Jinnah, the first Governor General of Pakistan


although in his first September


11, 1947, hinted that in Pakistan people of all


religion would be equal without any religious


discrimination but its first Constitution, made in


1956, declared the country as the Islamic


Republic of Pakistan. The Constitution of 1962


made no difference. Pakistan, since the death of 


its first Governor General, reduced itself into a


theocratic nation as happened in medival


Europe. 





But the high ideals of equality and fraterni-


ty so very gloriously enshrined in Islam could


not spare the majority Population of the erst-


while East Pakistan from total discrimination in


all spheres of the State without any exception,


The erstwhile East Pakistan was treated as a


colony of West Pakistan and when VOICE Was


raised praying for at least near equal treatment,


steamroller of oppression was perpetrated on the


people of the Eastern wing. After a long 23 years,


the first general election in Pakistan was held in


1970 with one of the objects, to frame a


Constitution. The National Assembly was sched-


uled to be convened at Dhaka on March 3, 1971,


but General Yahya Khan, the President and


CMLA postponed the Assembly, forcing the


country into turmoil. Thereafter, on the night fol-


lowing March 25, 1971, General Yahya Khan


and his military government unleashed the worst


genocide in the history of mankind on the


unarmed people of the erstwhile East Pakistan,


and the ‘valiant’ armed forces of Pakistan brutal-


ly killed millions. The vast majority of the people


of this part of the world are God-fearing Muslims


but their religion could not even save the fellow


Muslims from being persecuted, killed and raped


and their belongings being plundered and all


ironically in the name of Islam.


<br>





Of necessity and  being forced, the unarmed 





simple-minded Bengalees of then East 


Pakistan took up arms and rose against the


tyranny for their survival. After liberation, such


oppression and persecution on the Bangalee


population was very much fresh in their minds.


They were determined to establish an independent


 sovereign nation based on the democratic


principles of equality and social justice where


nobody will be discriminated on the ground of


religion.


            
 As such, the framers of the Constitution,


from their earlier bitter experience during, the


jjberation war, gave effect to the above lofty


ideals of our martyrs, which were reflected in


the Preamble and Article 8(1), and other provi-


gions of our Constitution. Those are the basic


gtructures of the Constitution, which were


changed on replacement of the provisions of the


original Preamble and Article 8(1) by the


proclamation Order No. | of 1977 and Second


Proclamation Order No. IV of 1978, but such


replacements changed the secular character of the


Republic of Bangladesh into a theocratic State.


<br>


In this connection it should be remembered


that the purpose of a Constitution is not to


describe the tenets of a particular religion but is


an Instrument creating the high institutions of


the Republic and its relationship with its people.


A Constitution upholds and guarantees such


dignity to the people of the Republic with its


own rights and also its obligations to the


Republic in a broader sense but the religion of a


particular section or sections of people shall nei-


ther required to be highlighted nor be interfered


with in an ideal and model democratic form of


Republic. The Constitution of such a Republic


would never contain or refer to a particular faith


but would leave such faculties with the people


themselves, Bangladesh was dreamt of as a sec-


ular country and came into being as a secular


country, as such, its Constitution was framed on


that ideal, but any change from such a basis


would constitute a change of the basic structure


of the Constitution.


<br>


Such belief would reside with the people in


accordance with their free will and shall never


be interfered with, either by the State or any


Section of the population, however majority


they may be. Such a secular concept would be


inhibited in a modern democratic Constitution


unless, of course, it is a theocratic State.





139. According to Thomas Paine, the purpose


Of the Constitution is -—-


<br>


“A Constitution is not the act of a govern-


ment, but of a people constituting a govern-


ment, and a government without a Constitution


is power without right ............... A consti-


tution is a thing antecedent to a government;


and a government is only the creature of a con-


stitution.” (1792) (Quoted from Hilaire Barnett


on Constitutional And administrative Law,


Fourth Edition, 2002, Page-7).





140. According to O Hood Phillips, the pur-


pose of the Constitution is :—


<br>


“The Constitution of a state in the abstract


sense is the system of laws, customs and con-


ventions which define the composition and


powers of organs of the state, and regulate the


relations of the various state organs to one


another and to the private citizen. A


“Constitution” in the concrete sense is the doc-


ument in which the most important laws of the


Constitution are authoritatively ordained.”


(Quoted from O Hood Phillips’ Constitutional


and Administrative Law, Seventh Edition, 1987,


at page-S).


<br>


From the discussions made above on the


concept of written Constitution it would appear


that this instrument is predominantly for the


purpose of regulating the rights and obligations


of the people vis-a-vis the State and vice versa


but it has got nothing to do with the religious


beliefs of its people.


<br>


Bangladesh came into being with the basic


concepts of nationalism, socialism, democracy


and secularism. As such, its Constitution was


framed with those ideals in view. It was never


intended to be a theocratic State. Rather, it was


one of the major reasons for the Bengalees for


their costly struggle for liberation.


<br>


In this connection it should be noted that


the obligation of the State, in this respect, is to


ensure that all persons in the Country can per-


form their respective religious functions.


Besides, the State is to ensure that no discrimi-





            
nation is made between the followers of one


religion over the other.”





141. The High Court Division also referred the


case of SR Bommai vs Union of India AIR 1994 SC


1918 wherein the addition of “Socialist” and


“Secularism” the Constitution of India in the year


1976 was considered. Ahmedi, J. (as his Lordship then


was) in considering secularism as one of the basic


structures of the Constitution observed at para 28:


<br><br>


“Notwithstanding the fact that the words


‘Socialist’, and ‘Secular’ were added in the


Preamble of the Constitution in 1976 by the


42nd Amendment, the concept of Secularism


was very much embedded in our Constitutional


philosophy ...... By this amendment what was


implicit was made explicit. The Preamble itself


spoke of liberty of thought, expression, belief,


faith and worship. While granting this liberty


the Preamble promised equality of status and


opportunity. It also spoke of promoting fraterni-


ty, thereby assuring the dignity of the individual


and the unity and integrity of the Nation. While


granting to its citizen’s liberty of belief, faith


and worship, the Constitution abhorred discrim-


ination on grounds of religion etc., but permit-


ted special treatment for Scheduled Castes and


Tribes, vide Articles 15 and 16. Art. 25 next


provided, subject to public order, morality and


health, that all persons shall be entitled to free-


dom of conscience and the right to profess,


practice and propagate religion. Art. 26 grants to


every religious denomination or any section


thereof, the right to establish and maintain insti-


tutions for religious purposes and to manage its


own affairs in matters of religion. These two


articles clearly confer a right to freedom of reli-


BION... ovviveceseecnacs State’s revenue cannot be


utilised for the promotion and maintenance of


any religion or religious group that secularism


is a basic feature of our Constitution.......... “


(Page-1951-52)





142, In considering the concept of secularism,


Sawant, J, held at para -88:





Chowdhury’ case evaluates Constitution |!


manner at para-272, page-118:-—





“These contention inevitably INViLe ys tod


cuss the concept of secularism as accepted |


our Constitution, Our Constitution does not ha


hibit the practice of any religion either ciate


or publicly


<br>


....... Under Articles 14, 15 and 4


Constitution prohibits discrimination ABAINSL any


citizen on the ground of his religion and guaran.


tees equal protection of law and equal Opportu-


nity of public employment.(Page 2000)...


 These provisions by implication prohibit


the establishment of a theocratic State and pre-


vent the State either identifying itself with of


favouring any particular religion or religious


sect or denomination, The State is enjoined to


accord equal treatment to all religions and relj-


gious sects and denominations. (Page-2000).


.......


<br>





K. Ramaswamy, J, quoting Dr S Radhakri-


shnan and Mahtma Gandhi, explained the con-


cept of secularism as a basic feature of Constitu-


tion of India, at para —124:


<br>


” 124 The Constitution has


chosen secularism as its vehicle to establish


an egalitarian social order. | am respectfully


in agreement with our brethren Sawant and


Jeevan Reddy, JJ. In this respect. Secularism,


therefore, is part of the fundamental law and


basic structure of the Indian political system


to secure all its people socio-economic needs


essential for man’s excellence and of mor


well being, fulfillment of material prosper")


and political justice.” (Page-2019 -20)





<br>


Shahabuddin Ahmed, J in Anwar Hossain


Chowdhuary's case ealutes Constitution in this


manner at para-272, page-118:-


<br>


“On the one hand, it gives out-lines of the


state apparatus, and aspirations of the people ; it


gives guarantees of fundamental rights of a cit-


izen and wlso makes him aware of his solemn


duty to himself} to his tellow citizen and to his


country,”





            
 No wonder his Lordship did not see any role of


religion in the Constitution itself. As such, from the


discussions made above, it is very clear that the


proclamations Order No. 1 of 1977 and the Second


proclamation Order No. IV of 1978, by making


omitting secularism, one of the State policy from the


Constitution, destroyed one of the basis of our strug-


ole for freedom and also changed the basic charac-


tet of the Republic as enshrined in the Preamble as


well as in Article 8(1) of the Constitution.





143. The High Court Division then quoting


original Article 6 of the Constitution and its amend-


ed version as shown in the above chart held as fol-


lows:—


<br>


..........................................................


<br>





The inhabitants of this part of the world


irrespective of their cast, creed and religion


were known as Bengalees from time immemo-


rial. In their lighter moments they laugh as a


Bangalee, in their despair they cry as a


Bangalee, they record their feelings in Bangla,


their history, their philosophy, their culture,


their literature are all in Bangla. These finer fea-


tures of life and intellects gave them an identity


as a race in India for more than thousand years.


This was so recorded in the memoirs of Hiuen


Tsang, Ibn Batuta and many other travellers.


Even during the reign of Emperor Akbar, this


part of his empire was known as ‘Sube Bangla’.


As such, this identity as a Bangalee was not a


mere illusion or frivolous idiosyncrasy but has a


definite character, which separated them from


other races in Pakistan. The identity of Punjabis,


Pathans ete might have faded away in their new


identity as Pakistanis but the Bengalees con-


sciously kept their separate entity in their cul-


ture and literature inspite of their Pakistani citi-


zenship. This was their pride. Their such entity


as Bangalee blooms in their weal and woe. This


sentiment may not have strict legal value but


this very sentiment of Bangalee nationalism


paved the way to the ultimate independent


Bangladesh, which has a very definite legal


existence. As such, nobody, how high so ever,


must not ignore or undervalue the words


‘Bangla’ or ‘Bangalee’ because since 1952,


beginning with the martyrs of language move-


ment, thousands of Bengalees gave their lives for


their right not only to speak Bangla but also to


live as such Bangalee. It is their basic nght and


very naturally, their Constitution recognised it.


<br>


Since this unwanted change of identity


from ‘Bangalee’ to ‘Bangiadeshi’ does not com-


mensurate with our national entity, this amend-


ment goes to the root of our Bangalee national-


ism”.





144. The High Court Division then quoting the


provisions of original Articles 6 and 9 of the


Constitution and amended version of the same as


shown in the above chart found that this concept of


Bangalee nationalism as provided in original Article


6 was further expounded and explained in the origi-





nal Article 9 of our Constitution.





The High Court Division held :—<br>


...This provision glorified our concept of


Bangalee nationalism. The framers of the


Constitution in their wisdom, thought it neces-


sary to specifically spell out the basis of


Bangalee nationalism in the Constitution itself.


There may be many reasons for it. One reason


may be that from time immemorial, this part of


the world which is known as. Bengal during


British regime was continuously. invaded by


Shok, Hun, Pathans, Moguls and lastly by the


English. As such, the Bengalees although


retained their entity through their literature and


cultural heritage but always governed by the


people other than Bengalees. That is one of the


reasons, Bengal voted so much in favour


Muslim League in 1946 election on the Pakistan


issue but even after independence from British


yoke, in no time, their enthusiasm got a jolt


when Mr Jinnah declared at Dhaka in 1948 that


“Urdu would be the only state-language of


Pakistan. This was followed by a long history of





            
conspiracies to cripple the majority East


Pakistan economically, politically and also to


destroy their cultural heritage and above all


their pride the Bangalee Nationalism but


instead, with the rise of oppression, Bengali


nationalism got new exuberance. The Pakistani


Military Janta instead of settling the issues


politically unleashed the worst genocide in the


history of mankind. One of their prime objec-


tives was to destroy and sweep away our


Bangalee nationalism from root, once for all


and make the Bengalees a hundred percent


Pakistani. In order to achieve such an ill-


advised end they did not only hesitate to kill


millions of innocent Bengalees and plunder


their belongings but also did their best to change


their identity as Bangalee.


<br>


In this historical context, the framers of the


Constitution in their anxiety, specifically spelt


out the basis of Bangalee nationalism in the


Constitution so that there should not be any con-


fusion about their entity as Bangalee. Because,


they had apprehensions like Justice Davies that


this country may not always ‘have wise and


humane rulers......... wicked men, ambitious of


power, with, hatred of liberty and contempt of


law, may fill the place.............


<br>


Our history shows that their anxiety was


not for nothing but was painfully correct


because inspite of Article 7 of the Constitution ,


as stated earlier, the usurpers by declaring


Martial Law seized the State Power. General


Ziaur Rahman by Proclamations Order No. | of


1977 and the Second Proclamation Order No.


IV of 1978, deleted Article 9 altogether, con-


taining the basis of Bengali nationalism. This


portion of the Proclamation Order did exactly


what the Pakistani Military Janta wanted to do


in Bangladesh in 1971. The similarity of inten-





tions is so stark that it makes one start with sur-


prise.


<br>


We fail to understand why Article 9 had to


be repealed completely and possibly in order to





camouflage the repealed Article, it was substi-


tuted with a new one, which has no nexus with


Bangalee nationalism. 


<br>


.......................................


<br>





The substituted Article 9 is in respect of


promotion of local Government Institutions but


Articles 11, 59 and 60 adequately provided tor


such institutions, as such, this substitution Was


unnecessary. The new provision, however


important it may appear but cannot delete the


basis of our Bangalee nationalism, contained in


original Article 9, for which the people of


Bangladesh fought for liberation and martyrs


made their supreme sacrifices. The original


Article 9 glorified our Bangalee Nation-hood,


possibly for the first time in our history, jn


recognition of such  nation-hood, — the


Constitution embalmed it as one its basic strue-


tures but its deletion by a Proclamation Order


constituted a betrayal to the freedom fighters


and the three million martyrs and an insult to


our Nation-hood”. :





145. The High Court Division then quoting the


provision of original Article 10 of the Constitution


and its amended version as shown in the above chart


held that original Article 10, being one of the funda-


mental ideals on which the struggle for national lib-


eration was fought, was spelt out in the Constitution


as one of its basic structures and the amended pro-


vision provides for participation of women in


national life but this is already well provided for in


Article 28, as such, this substitution was unneces-


sary and redundant. |


<br>


The High Court Division also held—


<br>


This substituted provision has no nexus


with the original provision, which spelt out


establishment of a socialistic economic system


and exploitation free society for Bangladesh.


The people of Bangladesh dreamt of such a


society for ages. In order to establish such an


idealistic society the people of Bangladesh gave





            
 their lives. As such, the provision containing


such idealism, very rightly found its place in the


Constitution as one of the fundamental princi-


ples of State Policy. This being one of the basis


for our struggle for liberation, this provision


was one of the basic structures of the


Constitution.


<br>


Without going into the merit of the substi-


tuted Article 10, we admit that we do not find


any plausible reason to delete such a glorious


provision for the salvation of fellow human


being.


<br>


Then regarding Articles 9 and 10 the High


Court Division held as follows:—


<br>


We have a shrewd suspicion that the substi-


tuted Article 9 and Article 10 were incorporated


in the Constitution only as an excuse for delet-


ing the original provisions because both the


substituted provisions are well provided for.


Article 11 read with Articles 59 and 60 covers


the substituted Article 9 while Article 28 takes


care of the substituted Article 10.


<br>


In this connection, it should be remem-


bered that a provision in the Constitution gives


_ only the basic law with wide ideas and the


Parliament enacts laws to give effect to those


ideas. If we examine the substituted Article 9


and Article 10 it would appear that Article 11


tead with Articles 59 and 60 and Article 28


Serves the purposes of those two substituted


Provisions very well and as a matter of fact


those two Articles are redundant and apparently


Were substituted only to camouflage the original


Article9 and the original Article 10 which were


TWO basic features of our Constitution.





146. The High Court Division then quoting the


original provision of Article 12 of the Constitution


as shown in the above chart, which was omitted


from the Constitution by the Proclamation Order


No. 1 of 1977, held as follows:—


<br>


..............................................


<br>








This provision of secularism explained and


expounded in Article 12, is one of the most


important and unique basic features of the


Constitution. Secularism means both religious


tolerance as well as religious freedom. It envis-


ages equal treatment to all irrespective of caste,


creed or religion but the State must not show


any form of tilt or leaning towards any particu-


lar religion either directly or even remotely. It


requires maintenance of strict neutrality on the


part of the State in the matters of different reli-


gions professed by various communities in the


State. The State must not seen to be favouring


any particular religion, rather, ensure protection


to the followers of all faiths without any dis-


crimination including even to an atheist. This is


what it means by the principle of secularism.


<br><br>


Secularism was one of the ideals for which


the struggle for liberation was fought and own


and the framers of the Constitution in their wis-


dom in order to dispel any confusion, upheld


and protect the said ideal of secularism as spelt


it out in Article 12 of the Constitution as one of


the fundamental principles of State Policy.


Indeed this was one of the most important basic


features of the Constitution. But the said basic


feature of the Constitution was deleted by the


Proclamation Order No. 1 of 1977 and the


Second Proclamation Order No. IV of 1978 and


thereby sought to change the secular character


of the Republic of Bangladesh as enshrined in


the original Constitution”.





147. The High Court Division then quoting the


provision of original Article 25 of the Constitution


and its amended version as shown in the above chart


held as follows:


<br>


<br>


This clause-2 is redundant. The original


Article 25 itself provides for promotion of inter-


national peace, security and solidarity amongst


all the nations including of course, the Muslim


countries, in accordance with the charter of the











            
 United Nations. As such, its endeavor to foster


further relations amongst only with the Muslim


countries based on Islamic solidarity, as stated


in the added clause 2, can only be explained by


its leaning towards becoming an Islamic


Republic from a Secular Republic and thereby


destroying its one of the most important and sig-


nificant basic feature of our Constitution, name-


ly, secularism”.





148. The High Court Division then quoting the


original Article 38 of the Constitution and its provi-


so as shown in the above chart, which was one of the


fundamental rights, and the omission of the above


proviso by. the Second Proclamation (Sixth


Amendment) Order 1976 held as follows:—


<br>


With the same object to destroy the secular


character of the Republic and its Constitution,


the proviso to Article 38 was omitted by the


Second Proclamation (Sixth Amendment)


Order, 1976 (Second Proclamation Order No.


III of 1976).





<br><br>


The above noted proviso to Article 38 was


meant to protect the secular character of the


Republic of Bangladesh in spite of one’s fundamen-


tal right to form an association as envisaged in


Article 38, but the above proviso was omitted by the


Second Proclamation Order No. III of 1976, made


by Justice Abu Sadat Mohammad Sayem, a nomi-


nated President of Bangladesh and CMLA. Since


the secular character of the Republic was one of the


objectives of the struggle for liberation, the omis-


sion of the aforesaid provision from the


Constitution, as a bid or devise to change its such


basic character, tantamount to changing of the basic


feature of the Constitution.





149. The High Court Division then concluded


as follows:


<br>


We have discussed above the various provisions


of the Constitution. Those provisions were not only


the basic features of the Constitution but were also





the ideals for the struggle for liberation, the corner


stone of our Constitution. Those ideals were the. 


basis for the birth of the Republic of Bangladesh


But those basic features of the Consttitution were


changed by the various Martial Law Proclamations


<br>





<br>





Those Martial Law Proclamation Orders


of


1975, 1976 and 1977 were incorporated in


Fourth Schedule to the Constitution by its amen


ment as Paragraph 3A. The English versions of the


provisions discussed above were changed, deleted


and modified by the Proclamations (Amendment


Order, 1977 (Proclamations Order No. 1 of 1977


The Bengali versions of those very Provisions were


subsequently added, deleted or amended by The


Second Proclamations (Fifteenth Amendment)


Order, 1978 (Second Proclamation Order No. IV of


1978).


<br>


In pursuance to the above Order the original


Bengali text of the part of the Preamble, Articles 6,


8, 9, 10, 12, 25(2) and the Proviso to Article 38 were


amended on the false pretext of persistent demand to


repeal the undemocratic provisions although the


aforesaid provisions are all the glorious basic fea-


tures of the Constitution and had no nexus with the


Fourth Amendment. All these changes of the basic


structures of the Constitution were sought to be rat-


ified, confirmed and validated by the Fifth


Amendment apparently by playing fraud upon the


members of the Second Parliament.





The pretexts to amend the Constitution in the


above manner in the garb of repealing the undemo-


cratic provisions of the Constitution incorporated


therein by the Constitution (Fourth Amendment)


Act, 1975, was altogether misconceived. Firstly


because the Fourth Amendment of the Constitution.


whatever its political merits or demerits, it W4


brought about by the representatives of the people


by an overwhelming majority members of a sover-


eign Parliament. Secondly, however undemocratic


the Fourth Amendment may appear to an army com-


mander, the amendment of the Constitution, could


CMLA or


any person, how high so ever, but only by a


Parliament. Thirdly, Major General Ziaur Rahman





            
being an usurper to the Office of the President and


in the Office of the legally non-existent Chief


Administrator, had no authority to


change the Constitution, As an Officer of the


Defence Services, he took oath to protect the


constitution of Bangladesh, but instead, on April 23,


1977, only two days after assuming the office of


president, he illegally and without any lawful


authority amended the various provisions of the


Constitution which Were the fundamental basis for


the struggle for liberation, by the Proclamation


Order No. 1 of 1977 and the Second Proclamation


Order No. IV of 1978, and made the secular


Republic of Bangladesh, a theocratic State, thereby


the cause of the liberation War of Bangladesh was


betrayed.


<br><br>


By virtue of the above two Proclamation Orders


all the Proclamations, MLRs and MLOs were vali-


dated and were entered in the Fourth Schedule to the


Constitution as paragraphs 3A and 6B while para-


graph 6A was inserted there earlier by Second


Proclamation Order No. IV of 1976. Since it was


known that in the face of the Constitution, those


amendments would be void ab initio, as such,


amendment of the Constitution itself was made in a


bid to validate those Proclamations etc. by the Fifth


Amendment.





150. As it appears the High Court Division


gave detail reasons for not condoning the omission


of secularism as was provided in original preamble,


Articles 8(1), 12 and other connected changes made


in the Constitution in this regard. The High Court


Division similarly did not also condone the substitu-


tion of Articles 6, S(1), 9 and other connected


Articles of the original Constitution, which dealt


With nationalism, socialism and connected matters.





151. From the contents of the proceeding of


the Constitutional Assembly it appears that for days


claborate discussion was made in respect of secular-


ism, nationalism and socialism and then those were


incorporated at Chapter 11 of our Constitution,


which contained the fundamental principles of State


Policy.





152. As will be evident from the case of SR


Bommai vs Union of India (supra) which we have


dismissed earlier, in the original Constitution of


India enacted in the year 1949 there was no mention


of secularism and socialism. Then in the year 1976


“socialist” and “secular” were incorporated in the


Constitution of India by the 42th Amendment. In -


this regard in the above case Ramasyem, J held as


follows:—


<br>


" The Constitution has cho-


sen secularism as its vehicle to establish an


egalitarian social order. I am respectfully in


agreement with our brethren Sawant and Jeevan


Reddy, JJ. In this respect. Secularism, therefore,


is part of the fundamental law and basic struc-


ture of the Indian political system to secure all


its people socio-economic needs essential for


man’s excellence and of moral well being, ful-


fillment of material prosperity and political jus-


tice.” (Page—2019 -20)





153. We, while deciding the power of the


Court of judicial review, found that the High Court


Division has the jurisdiction to decide as to whether


any act or legislative measure made by any authori-


ty not competent to do so and/or such act or legisla-


tive measure made/done otherwise than in accor-


dance with the procedure prescribed by the


Constitution and/or are repugnant to the provisions


of Constitution. As would be discussed later on in


details, by Proclamations (Amendment) Order No. |


of 1977 (Proclamation Order No. | of 1977) and by


Second Proclamation (Fifteenth Amendment) Order


1978 (Second Proclamation Order No. IV of 1978)


omission of secularism and substitution of Articles 6


and 10 by the authorities not competent to promul-


gate/make those and by those Orders Constitution


was also changed in the manner not prescribed by


the Constitution and accordingly those Orders are


illegal, void and non est, Preamble and the relevant


provisions of the Constitution in respect of secular-


ism, nationalism and socialism, as existed on August


15, 1975, will revive. However in respect of nation-


alism, as to be discussed later on, we are inclined to


condone the substituted provision of Article 6.



            
